Utah statutes.
17-28-1.   County Fire Civil Service Council.

(1)  There is created in each of the counties of this state having and maintaining a regularly organized fire department in which there are regularly employed four or more paid firefighters, a County Fire Civil Service Council consisting of three members to be appointed by the county executive.

(2)  Each member shall serve for a term of three years except that the county executive shall appoint the original council members as follows:

(a)  one member for a period of one year;

(b)  one member for a period of two years; and

(c)  one member for a period of three years.



Amended by Chapter 158, 2002 General Session

